assets/javascript/tinymce/plugins/spellchecker/dicts/es_ES.aff
SFX  apar pale apar
SFX  apar pales apar
SFX  arir rele arir
SFX  arir reles arir
SFX  arrar rrale arrar
SFX  arrar rrales arrar
SFX  egar gale egar
SFX  egar gales egar
SFX  eglar glale eglar
SFX  eglar glales eglar
SFX  ejar jale ejar
SFX  ejar jales ejar
SFX  entar ntale entar
SFX  entar ntales entar
SFX  ear ale ear
SFX  ear ales ear
SFX  erar rale erar
SFX  erar rales erar
SFX  ercar rcale ercar
SFX  ercar rcales ercar
SFX  estar stale estar
SFX  estar stales estar
SFX  eter tele eter
SFX  eter teles eter
SFX  evar vale evar
SFX  evar vales evar
SFX  icar cale icar
SFX  icar cales icar
SFX  iciar ciale iciar
SFX  iciar ciales iciar
SFX  igir gele igir
SFX  igir geles igir
SFX  imar male imar
SFX  imar males imar
SFX  ingar ngale ingar
SFX  ingar ngales ingar
SFX  irar rale irar
SFX  irar rales irar
SFX  irmar rmale irmar
SFX  irmar rmales irmar
SFX  isar sale isar
SFX  isar sales isar
SFX  istar stale istar
SFX  istar stales istar
SFX  izar zale izar
SFX  izar zales izar
SFX  ocar cale ocar
SFX  ocar cales ocar
SFX  onar nale onar
SFX  onar nales onar
SFX  onder ndele onder
SFX  onder ndeles onder
SFX  orar rale orar
SFX  orar rales orar
SFX  uchar chales uchar
SFX  uchar chale uchar
SFX  udar dales udar
SFX  udar dale udar
SFX  ultar ltales ultar
SFX  ultar ltale ultar
SFX  umir meles umir
SFX  umir mele umir
SFX  unciar nciales unciar
SFX  unciar nciale unciar
SFX  untar ntales untar
SFX  untar ntale untar
SFX  uscar scales uscar
SFX  uscar scale uscar

SFX  Y 264
SFX  adir demela adir
SFX  adir demelas adir
SFX  adir demelo adir
SFX  adir demelos adir
SFX  adir denosla adir
SFX  adir denoslas adir
SFX  adir denoslo adir
SFX  adir denoslos adir
SFX  adir desela adir
SFX  adir deselas adir
SFX  adir deselo adir
SFX  adir deselos adir
SFX  ir dmela ir
SFX  ir dmelas ir
SFX  ir dmelo ir
SFX  ir dmelos ir
SFX  ir dnosla ir
SFX  ir dnoslas ir
SFX  ir dnoslo ir
SFX  ir dnoslos ir
SFX  ir dsela ir
SFX  ir dselas ir
SFX  ir dselo ir
SFX  ir dselos ir
SFX  ambiar mbiamela ambiar
SFX  ambiar mbiamelas ambiar
SFX  ambiar mbiamelo ambiar
SFX  ambiar mbiamelos ambiar
SFX  ambiar mbianosla ambiar
SFX  ambiar mbianoslas ambiar
SFX  ambiar mbianoslo ambiar
SFX  ambiar mbianoslos ambiar
SFX  ambiar mbiasela ambiar
SFX  ambiar mbiaselas ambiar
SFX  ambiar mbiaselo ambiar
SFX  ambiar mbiaselos ambiar
SFX  ar dmela ar
SFX  ar dmelas ar
SFX  ar dmelo ar
SFX  ar dmelos ar
SFX  ar dnosla ar
SFX  ar dnoslas ar
SFX  ar dnoslo ar
SFX  ar dnoslos ar
SFX  ar dsela ar
SFX  ar dselas ar
SFX  ar dselo ar
SFX  ar dselos ar
SFX  ancar ncamela ancar
SFX  ancar ncamelas ancar
SFX  ancar ncamelo ancar
SFX  ancar ncamelos ancar
SFX  ancar ncanosla ancar
SFX  ancar ncanoslas ancar
SFX  ancar ncanoslo ancar
SFX  ancar ncanoslos ancar
SFX  ancar ncasela ancar
SFX  ancar ncaselas ancar
SFX  ancar ncaselo ancar
SFX  ancar ncaselos ancar
SFX  antar ntamela antar
SFX  antar ntamelas antar
SFX  antar ntamelo antar
SFX  antar ntamelos antar
SFX  antar ntanosla antar
SFX  antar ntanoslas antar
SFX  antar ntanoslo antar
SFX  antar ntanoslos antar
SFX  antar ntasela antar
SFX  antar ntaselas antar
SFX  antar ntaselo antar
SFX  antar ntaselos antar
SFX  anzar nzamela anzar
SFX  anzar nzamelas anzar
SFX  anzar nzamelo anzar
SFX  anzar nzamelos anzar
SFX  anzar nzanosla anzar
SFX  anzar nzanoslas anzar
SFX  anzar nzanoslo anzar
SFX  anzar nzanoslos anzar
SFX  anzar nzasela anzar
SFX  anzar nzaselas anzar
SFX  anzar nzaselo anzar
SFX  anzar nzaselos anzar
SFX  asar samela asar
SFX  asar samelas asar
SFX  asar samelo asar
SFX  asar samelos asar
SFX  asar sanosla asar
SFX  asar sanoslas asar
SFX  asar sanoslo asar
SFX  asar sanoslos asar
SFX  asar sasela asar
SFX  asar saselas asar
SFX  asar saselo asar
SFX  asar saselos asar
SFX  ear amela ear
SFX  ear amelas ear
SFX  ear amelo ear
SFX  ear amelos ear
SFX  ear anosla ear
SFX  ear anoslas ear
SFX  ear anoslo ear
SFX  ear anoslos ear
SFX  ear asela ear
SFX  ear aselas ear
SFX  ear aselo ear
SFX  ear aselos ear
SFX  eder demela eder
SFX  eder demelas eder
SFX  eder demelo eder
SFX  eder demelos eder
SFX  eder denosla eder
SFX  eder denoslas eder
SFX  eder denoslo eder
SFX  eder denoslos eder
SFX  eder desela eder
SFX  eder deselas eder
SFX  eder deselo eder
SFX  eder deselos eder
SFX  er dmela er
SFX  er dmelas er
SFX  er dmelo er
SFX  er dmelos er
SFX  er dnosla er
SFX  er dnoslas er
SFX  er dnoslo er
SFX  er dnoslos er
SFX  er dsela er
SFX  er dselas er
SFX  er dselo er
SFX  er dselos er
SFX  eer emela eer
SFX  eer emelas eer
SFX  eer emelo eer
SFX  eer emelos eer
SFX  eer enosla eer
SFX  eer enoslas eer
SFX  eer enoslo eer
SFX  eer enoslos eer
SFX  eer esela eer
SFX  eer eselas eer
SFX  eer eselo eer
SFX  eer eselos eer
SFX  egar gamela egar
SFX  egar gamelas egar
SFX  egar gamelo egar
SFX  egar gamelos egar
SFX  egar ganosla egar
SFX  egar ganoslas egar
SFX  egar ganoslo egar
SFX  egar ganoslos egar
SFX  egar gasela egar
SFX  egar gaselas egar
SFX  egar gaselo egar
SFX  egar gaselos egar
SFX  ejar jamela ejar
SFX  ejar jamelas ejar
SFX  ejar jamelo ejar
SFX  ejar jamelos ejar
SFX  ejar janosla ejar
SFX  ejar janoslas ejar
SFX  ejar janoslo ejar
SFX  ejar janoslos ejar
SFX  ejar jasela ejar
SFX  ejar jaselas ejar
SFX  ejar jaselo ejar
SFX  ejar jaselos ejar
SFX  ear amela ear
SFX  ear amelas ear
SFX  ear amelo ear
SFX  ear amelos ear
SFX  ear anosla ear
SFX  ear anoslas ear
SFX  ear anoslo ear
SFX  ear anoslos ear
SFX  ear asela ear
SFX  ear aselas ear
SFX  ear aselo ear
SFX  ear aselos ear
SFX  eter temela eter
SFX  eter temelas eter
SFX  eter temelo eter
SFX  eter temelos eter
SFX  eter tenosla eter
SFX  eter tenoslas eter
SFX  eter tenoslo eter
SFX  eter tenoslos eter
SFX  eter tesela eter
SFX  eter teselas eter
SFX  eter teselo eter
SFX  eter teselos eter
SFX  ibir bemela ibir
SFX  ibir bemelas ibir
SFX  ibir bemelo ibir
SFX  ibir bemelos ibir
SFX  ibir benosla ibir
SFX  ibir benoslas ibir
SFX  ibir benoslo ibir
SFX  ibir benoslos ibir
SFX  ibir besela ibir
SFX  ibir beselas ibir
SFX  ibir beselo ibir
SFX  ibir beselos ibir
SFX  icar camela icar
SFX  icar camelas icar
SFX  icar camelo icar
SFX  icar camelos icar
SFX  icar canosla icar
SFX  icar canoslas icar
SFX  icar canoslo icar
SFX  icar canoslos icar
SFX  icar casela icar
SFX  icar caselas icar
SFX  icar caselo icar
SFX  icar caselos icar
SFX  inar namela inar
SFX  inar namelas inar
SFX  inar namelo inar
SFX  inar namelos inar
SFX  inar nanosla inar
SFX  inar nanoslas inar
SFX  inar nanoslo inar
SFX  inar nanoslos inar
SFX  inar nasela inar
SFX  inar naselas inar
SFX  inar naselo inar
SFX  inar naselos inar
SFX  obrar bramela obrar
SFX  obrar bramelas obrar
SFX  obrar bramelo obrar
SFX  obrar bramelos obrar
SFX  obrar branosla obrar
SFX  obrar branoslas obrar
SFX  obrar branoslo obrar
SFX  obrar branoslos obrar
SFX  obrar brasela obrar
SFX  obrar braselas obrar
SFX  obrar braselo obrar
SFX  obrar braselos obrar
SFX  untar ntamelas untar
SFX  untar ntamela untar
SFX  untar ntamelos untar
SFX  untar ntamelo untar
SFX  untar ntanoslas untar
SFX  untar ntanosla untar
SFX  untar ntanoslos untar
SFX  untar ntanoslo untar
SFX  untar ntaselas untar
SFX  untar ntasela untar
SFX  untar ntaselos untar
SFX  untar ntaselo untar
SFX  urar ramelas urar
SFX  urar ramela urar
SFX  urar ramelos urar
SFX  urar ramelo urar
SFX  urar ranoslas urar
SFX  urar ranosla urar
SFX  urar ranoslos urar
SFX  urar ranoslo urar
SFX  urar raselas urar
SFX  urar rasela urar
SFX  urar raselos urar
SFX  urar raselo urar

SFX  Y 56
SFX  egar igala egar
SFX  egar igalas egar
SFX  egar igalo egar
SFX  egar igalos egar
SFX  r dla r
SFX  r dlas r
SFX  r dlo r
SFX  r dlos r
SFX  ender indela ender
SFX  ender indelas ender
SFX  ender indelo ender
SFX  ender indelos ender
SFX  ensar insala ensar
SFX  ensar insalas ensar
SFX  ensar insalo ensar
SFX  ensar insalos ensar
SFX  entar intala entar
SFX  entar intalas entar
SFX  entar intalo entar
SFX  entar intalos entar
SFX  errar irrala errar
SFX  errar irralas errar
