assets/javascript/tinymce/plugins/spellchecker/dicts/es_ES.dic
abundad/rt
cargremos/r
cargaran/rh
cargarlo/rSGh
cargarse/hpr
cargsemos/r
cargaste/hpr
carg/rpih
carguis/prh
ceja/prS
celestial/rS
cenan/r
cenen/r
ceno/gGr
cerrada/r
coge/bSphraji
cogis/rjbih
coger/jrbhi
coger/jrbhi
cogera/bSirhj
cogeran/brj
cogernos/ir
cogerte/ri
cogamos/rbj
cogido/rSGhbji
cogierais/brj
cogiera/rhbji
cogieren/bjr
cogisemos/rj
cogimos/rhbji
cogiste/rhbji
cojamos/ijbhr
comidas/r
crece/hrSpga
crecemos/r
crecer/r
creceremos/r
crecerais/r
crecera/rS
crecamos/r
creca/rSagph
creciendo/r
creciramos/r
creciera/r
crecieren/r
crecieseis/r
creciese/rS
creci/ragph
crezca/hpgar
crezcamos/r
cruces/r
curad/rop
cura/opr
cur/rpo
cur/rpo
diente/riSh
dorbamos/r
dorado/hSrp
doramos/hrp
doran/prah
dorarais/hr
doraran/hrp
dorars/prh
dorareis/hr
doraremos/r
dorarais/r
dorara/pSrh
dorarse/hrp
dorasen/hrp
dorasteis/r
doremos/hrp
dor/rhap
dosis/r
entenda/tsrh
entienda/trhs
exceda/r
exceden/r
exceda/r
excedo/rL
excitan/r
exciten/r
excito/r
falda/irS
frenada/rS
ganan/rha
gane/aGShr
gano/ahr
giran/r
girar/RrDE
gir/pr
herido/rSG
hilar/RpDrhia
hueso/rS
impresa/pr
impriman/rp
imprime/rGSp
imprimi/rp
imprimir/rRDpE
intendencia/rS
llenad/rp
llena/rp
llen/pr
llevad/fr
llevan/fr
lleve/fSGr
llev/fr
manos/bre
nadad/r
naden/r
nade/rSG
natural/fSrck
paga/oaprS
pasabais/ohr
pasaba/rShpo
pasis/oprh
pasndolo/rGS
pasa/ohpr
pasramos/r
pasaran/rpho
pasaris/ohr
pasremos/r
pasar/oprh
pasaramos/r
pasarla/rp
pasarme/rpo
pasaros/rpo
pasase/hrpo
passemos/r
pasasteis/r
pasemos/hopr
pase/oGShpr
pelos/rp
pintbamos/r
pintaba/prSh
pintis/rhp
pintndose/r
pinta/phr
pintarn/hpr
pintars/hpr
pintaris/rh
pintaren/rph
pintarais/r
pintaran/rh
pintarse/rph
pintasen/rph
pintas/rSph
pintis/rhp
pinte/pGShr
pinto/phr
ponernos/korl
pone/uSokgptalnbr
ponindola/rt
ponindoos/rk
primada/r
puerta/rSb
pujamiento/rS
puja/pri
puje/GSpri
puj/irp
ronda/rS
sabido/rSGf
salga/pr
salid/pr
sali/rp
sal/rpS
saltaban/rp
saltado/rSp
saltamos/rp
saltndoos/r
saltndose/r
salta/pear
saltarn/pr
saltar/pr
saltaris/r
saltremos/r
saltar/pr
saltaramos/r
saltara/rSp
saltarnos/r
saltaros/r
saltaseis/r
saltasen/rp
saltas/rSp
saltis/pr
salt/rap
salt/rap
sanan/psr
sanen/psr
san/rsp
sea/raS
sembr/rp
siembre/pr
solad/raskfg
suelan/sfrag
sueldo/rS
suele/sSGfrga
tercero/rS
veedor/poSr
vengo/afongplrst
vens/fatsrlgpno
vert/ksrpf
veste/rS
vestid/hikrp
vests/prkih
vienta/rpha
vierta/frpks
vierto/frpks
viste/ikrnGajhp
visti/pkrhi
viva/hrafpq
viven/rpahf
vivid/rphf
vivi/fhpr
vivir/rRDfEhp
volad/rp
vol/pr
vuele/pr
